Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1760
Statutory or common-law rights; available.

Nothing in the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act shall limit any statutory or common-law rights of the Attorney General, any county attorney, or any city attorney, or any other person. If any act or practice prescribed under the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act also constitutes a cause of action in common law or a violation of another statute, the purchaser may assert such common-law or statutory cause of action under the procedures and with the remedies provided for in such other law.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 60;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 29.